cs: Kompatibilní forma vosku: Perličky tvrdého vosku; Horký filmový vosk; Parafínový vosk; Roll-on patrona; Měkký páskový vosk v plechovce; Univerzální; Voskové fazolky; Jiné
pl: Kompatybilna forma wosku: Perełki twardego wosku; Gorący wosk filmowy; Parafina; Wkład roll-on; Puszka miękkiego wosku do pasków; Uniwersalny; Fasolki woskowe; Inne
pt-BR: Forma de cera compatível: Pérolas de cera dura; Cera quente em película; Cera de parafina; Cartucho roll-on; Lata de cera mole para tiras; Universal; Grãos de cera; Outro
vi: Dạng sáp tương thích: Hạt sáp cứng; Sáp màng nóng; Sáp paraffin; Hộp lăn; Hộp sáp mềm dạng miếng; Phổ quát; Đậu sáp; Khác
sk-SK: Kompatibilná forma vosku: Guličky tvrdého vosku; Horúci filmový vosk; Parafínový vosk; Roll-on kazeta; Plechovka mäkkého pásikového vosku; Univerzálny; Voskové fazuličky; Iné
nl: Compatibele wasvorm: Harde waxparels; Hete filmwax; Paraffinewas; Roll-on cartridge; Zachte stripwax blik; Universeel; Waxbonen; Andere
es: Forma de cera compatible: Perlas de cera dura; Cera caliente en película; Cera de parafina; Cartucho roll-on; Lata de cera blanda en tiras; Universal; Granos de cera; Otros
ro-RO: Forma de ceară compatibilă: Perle de ceară dură; Ceară peliculă caldă; Ceară de parafină; Cartuș roll-on; Cutie de ceară moale pentru benzi; Universal; Boabe de ceară; Altele
hu: Kompatibilis viaszforma: Kemény viaszgyöngyök; Forró filmviasz; Paraffinviasz; Roll-on patron; Puha csíkviasz doboz; Általános; Viaszbabok; Egyéb
el: Συμβατή μορφή κεριού: Σκληρές χάντρες κεριού; Ζεστό κερί φιλμ; Κερί παραφίνης; Φυσίγγιο roll-on; Κουτί μαλακού κεριού λωρίδας; Καθολικής χρήσης; Φασόλια κεριού; Άλλο
fi: Yhteensopiva vahan muoto: Kovavahahelmet; Kuuma kalvovaha; Parafiinivaha; Roll-on-patruuna; Pehmeän liuskavahan tölkki; Yleinen; Vahapavut; Muu
zh-TW: 相容蠟形式: 硬蠟珠; 熱膜蠟; 石蠟; 滾輪卡匣; 軟條蠟罐; 通用; 蠟豆; 其他
ru: Совместимая форма воска: Гранулы твердого воска; Горячий пленочный воск; Парафин; Роликовый картридж; Банка с мягким воском для полосок; Универсальное; Восковые бобы; Другой
sl-SI: Združljiva oblika voska: Trdi vosek v kroglicah; Vroči filmski vosek; Parafinski vosek; Roll-on kartuša; Mehki vosek za trakove v pločevinki; Univerzalno; Vosek v zrnih; Drugo
fr: Forme de cire compatible: Perles de cire dure; Cire chaude pelliculable; Cire de paraffine; Cartouche roll-on; Boîte de cire à bandes; Universel; Grains de cire; Autre
nb: Kompatibel voksform: Hardvoksperler; Varmfilmvoks; Parafinvoks; Roll-on-patron; Myk stripevoks i boks; Universal; Voksbønner; Annet
bg-BG: Съвместима форма на восък: Твърди восъчни перли; Горещ филмов восък; Парафинов восък; Ролков патрон; Мек восък за ленти в кутия; Универсален; Восъчни зрънца; Други
en: Compatible wax form: Hard wax beads; Hot film wax; Paraffin wax; Roll-on cartridge; Soft strip wax can; Universal; Wax beans; Other
ja: 対応ワックス形態: ハードワックスビーズ; ホットフィルムワックス; パラフィンワックス; ロールオンカートリッジ; ソフトストリップワックス缶; ユニバーサル; ワックスビーンズ; その他
th: รูปแบบแว็กซ์ที่ใช้ร่วมได้: เม็ดแว็กซ์แข็ง; ฟิล์มแว็กซ์ร้อน; ไขพาราฟิน; ตลับโรลออน; กระป๋องแว็กซ์แถบนุ่ม; อเนกประสงค์; เม็ดแว็กซ์; อื่นๆ
de: Kompatible Wachsform: Hartwachs-Perlen; Heißfilmwachs; Paraffinwachs; Roll-on-Kartusche; Weichstreifenwachs-Dose; Universell; Wachsbohnen; Sonstiges
da: Kompatibel voksform: Hård voks perler; Varm filmvoks; Paraffinvoks; Roll-on patron; Blød stribevoks dåse; Universal; Voksbønner; Andet
lt-LT: Suderinama vaško forma: Kieto vaško granulės; Karštas plėvelinis vaškas; Parafino vaškas; Ruloninė kasetė; Minkšto juostelinio vaško skardinė; Universalus; Vaško pupelės; Kita
pt-PT: Forma de cera compatível: Pérolas de cera dura; Cera filme quente; Cera de parafina; Cartucho roll-on; Lata de cera mole em tiras; Universal; Grãos de cera; Outro
ko: 호환 가능한 왁스 형태: 하드 왁스 비즈; 핫 필름 왁스; 파라핀 왁스; 롤온 카트리지; 소프트 스트립 왁스 캔; 범용; 왁스 빈; 기타
it: Forma di cera compatibile: Perle di cera dura; Cera a caldo pellicola; Cera di paraffina; Cartuccia roll-on; Barattolo di cera morbida in strisce; Universale; Chicchi di cera; Altro
tr: Uyumlu ağda formu: Sert ağda boncukları; Sıcak film ağda; Parafin mumu; Roll-on kartuş; Yumuşak şerit ağda kutusu; Her mekana uygun; Ağda fasulyeleri; Diğer
zh-CN: 兼容蜡形态: 硬蜡珠; 热膜蜡; 石蜡; 滚珠蜡盒; 软脱毛蜡罐; 通用; 蜡豆; 其他
sv: Kompatibel vaxform: Hårdvaxpärlor; Varmt filmvax; Paraffinvax; Roll-on kassett; Mjukt remsvax i burk; Universell; Vaxbönor; Övrigt
hr-HR: Kompatibilan oblik voska: Perlice tvrdog voska; Vruć film vosak; Parafinski vosak; Roll-on uložak; Limenka mekog voska za trake; Univerzalno; Zrna voska; Ostalo